en: Goblet of chocolate ice cream topped with whipped cream
fr: Coupe glacée au chocolat, Chocolat liégeois

en: Goblet of Belle Helene pear ice cream
fr: Coupe glacée parfum poire Belle-Hélène

en: Goblet of peach Melba ice cream
fr: Coupe glacée parfum pêche Melba

en: Fruit liegeois
fr: Liégeois aux fruits

fr: Compotes pour bébé, compote pour bébé, compotes pour bébés
de: Kompotte für Babys
lt: Kūdikių kompotai
nl: Babycompotes

en: Hotteok
xx: Hotteok

en: Sweet stuffed pastas
fr: Pâtes farcies sucrées

en: Chocolate desserts
bg: Шоколадови десерти
ca: Postres de xocolata
de: Schokoladendesserts, Schokoladennachspeisen, Schokoladennachtische
es: Postres de chocolate
fi: Suklaajälkiruoat
fr: Desserts au chocolat, Chocolats dessert, chocolats desserts, chocolat dessert
he: קינוחי שוקולד
hr: Čokoladni deserti
hu: Csokoládé desszertek
it: Dolci al cioccolato, Dessert al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai desertai
nl: Desserts met chocolade
pt: Sobremesas de chocolate
ru: Шоколадные десерты
zh: 巧克力甜品, 巧克力甜点

en: Chocolate mousses
de: Mousses au chocolat, Mousse au chocolat
es: Mousses de chocolate, Mousse de chocolate
fi: Suklaamousset
fr: Mousses au chocolat, Mousse au chocolat
hr: Čokoladne pjenice
it: Mousse al cioccolato
ja: チョコレートムース
lt: Šokoladiniai putėsiai
nl: Chocolademousses
pt: Mousses de chocolate

en: Refrigerated milk-based chocolate mousses
fr: Mousses au chocolat au lait rayon frais

en: Refrigerated chocolate mousses
fr: Mousses au chocolat traditionnelles rayon frais

en: Coffee desserts
de: Kaffeedesserts, Nachspeisen mit Kaffee
es: Postres de café
fi: Kahvijälkiruoat
fr: Desserts au café
hr: Deserti od kave
it: Dessert al caffè
lt: Kavos desertai, Desertai iš kavos
nl: Koffietoetjes, koffiedesserts
zh: 咖啡甜品, 咖啡甜点

en: Relish
xx: Relish
ar: المقبّلات
da: Relisher
eo: Reliŝoj
fa: گزک (چاشنی)
fi: Kurkkusalaatti
hy: Ռելիշ
ja: レリッシュ
ki: Gĩtoero
ko: 렐리시
pl: Relisz
ru: Релиш
sl: Reliš
sw: Kitoweo
uk: Реліш
zh: 開味小菜

en: Chutneys
xx: Chutneys
af: Blatjang
ar: كتنية
az: Çatni
ba: Чатни
be: Чатни
bg: Чътни
bn: চাটনি
br: Chatni
cs: Čatní
cy: Siytni
da: Chutneyer
el: Τσάτνεϊ
eo: Ĉatnioj
fa: چتنی
gu: ચટણી
hi: चटनी
ht: Chutne
hu: Csatni
hy: Չատնի
ja: チャツネ
kk: Чатни
kn: ಚಟ್ನಿ
ko: 차트니
ks: ژؠٹِنؠ
lt: Čatnis
lv: Čatniji, Čatnijs
ml: ചമ്മന്തി
mr: चटणी
ms: Cutni
my: ကျစ်တနီ
nb: Chutneyer
ne: चटनी
nn: Chutneyar
or: ଚଟଣୀ
pa: ਚਟਨੀ
ru: Чатни
sd: چٽڻي
sk: Čatní
sr: Čatni
ta: சட்னி
te: పచ్చడి
th: ชัตนีย์
uk: Чатні
ur: چٹنی
yi: טשאַטני

en: Fruit chutneys
da: Frugtchutneyer
de: Fruchtchutneys
es: Chutneys de fruta, Chutneys de frutas
fr: Chutneys de fruit
hr: Voćni chutneys
it: Chutney di frutta
lt: Vaisių čatniai
nb: Fruktchutneyer
nl: Fruitchutney
nn: Fruktchutneyar
sv: Fruktchutneys

en: Apple chutneys
da: Æblechutneyer
fr: Confits de pommme, Chutneys de pomme
hr: Chutneys od jabuka
lt: Obuolių čatniai
nb: Eplechutneyer
nl: Appelchutney
nn: Eplechutneyar
sv: Äppelchutneys
zh: 苹果酸辣酱

en: Fig chutneys
da: Figenchutneyer
de: Feigen Chutneys
fr: Confits de figues, chutneys de figues
hr: Ajvari od smokava
it: Mostarde di fichi
lt: Figų čatniai
nb: Fikenchutneyer
nl: Vijgenchutney
nn: Fikenchutneyar
sv: Fikonchutneys

en: Mango chutneys
da: Mangochutneyer
de: Mango Chutneys
fr: Chutneys de mangue, Confits de mangue
hr: Ajvari od manga
lt: Mangų čatniai
nb: Mangochutneyer
nl: Mangochutney
nn: Mangochutneyar
sv: Mangochutneys

en: Fruits coulis
de: Frucht Coulis
fr: Coulis de fruits
hr: Voće coulis
hu: Gyümölcs öntet
it: Coulis di frutta
nl: Vruchtencoulis

en: Frozen fruits coulis
fr: Coulis de fruits surgelés